Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-508
Secretary of State; deputy; duties.

The Secretary of State shall have power to appoint a deputy, and, when so appointed, the deputy shall do and perform, in case of the absence or disability of the secretary, all the duties herein authorized and required of the secretary, and the secretary shall be responsible for all the official acts of his deputy.

Laws 1877, § 7, p. 199;

R.S.1913, § 5574;

C.S.1922, § 4878;

C.S.1929, § 84-506;

R.S.1943, § 84-508.